Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 6

Joint Select Committee on Business Taxes [Repealed]

3-15-601. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 2; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011. Acts 2001, ch. 318, §§ 2-8; 2009, ch. 540, § 1, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-602. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-603. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 4; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-604. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 5; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-605. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 6; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-606. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 7; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.

3-15-607. [Repealed.]

Acts 2001, ch. 318, § 8; 2009, ch. 540, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§3-15-601 —3-15-607 concerned the joint select committee on business taxes.